Washington statutes.
RCW 18.71.315

Impaired physician account—Created.

The impaired physician account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from RCW 18.71.310 from license surcharges on physicians and physician assistants shall be deposited into the account. Expenditures from the account may only be used for the physician health program under this chapter. Only the secretary of health or the secretary's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. No appropriation is required for expenditures from this account.

[ 2022 c 43 s 6; 1998 c 132 s 12.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—Severability—1998 c 132: See notes following RCW 18.71.0195.